Connecticut, session 2026, SB00077.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-701 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
personal income tax deduction of up to sixty thousand dollars for the
cost of full-time home health care, including, but not limited to, the cost
of medical supplies and in-home services.